Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201848-643
Witnesses; fees.

Witnesses subpoenaed pursuant to sections 48-629 to 48-644 shall be allowed fees at a rate fixed by the commissioner, not to exceed the amount allowed for witness fees in district court. Such fees shall be deemed an expense of administering the Employment Security Law.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 6, p. 380;

Laws 1941, c. 94, § 4, p. 389;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-706;

R.S.1943, § 48-643;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 29;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 57.

For witness fees in district court, see section 33-139.